Colorado statutes. TITLE 6 Consumer and Commercial Affairs
PART 7 SPECIFIC PROVISIONS
6-1-716. Notification of security breach.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Biometric data" means unique biometric data generated from measurements or analysis of human body characteristics for the purpose of authenticating the individual when he or she accesses an online account.

"Covered entity" means a person, as defined in section 6-1-102 (6), that maintains, owns, or licenses personal information in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation. "Covered entity" does not include a person acting as a third-party service provider as defined in subsection (1)(i) of this section.

"Determination that a security breach occurred" means the point in time at which there is sufficient evidence to conclude that a security breach has taken place.

"Encrypted" means rendered unusable, unreadable, or indecipherable to an unauthorized person through a security technology or methodology generally accepted in the field of information security.

"Medical information" means any information about a consumer's medical or mental health treatment or diagnosis by a health-care professional.

"Notice" means:

Written notice to the postal address listed in the records of the covered entity;

Telephonic notice;

Electronic notice, if a primary means of communication by the covered entity with a Colorado resident is by electronic means or the notice provided is consistent with the provisions regarding electronic records and signatures set forth in the federal "Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 7001 et seq.; or

Substitute notice, if the covered entity required to provide notice demonstrates that the cost of providing notice will exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars, the affected class of persons to be notified exceeds two hundred fifty thousand Colorado residents, or the covered entity does not have sufficient contact information to provide notice. Substitute notice consists of all of the following:

E-mail notice if the covered entity has e-mail addresses for the members of the affected class of Colorado residents;

Conspicuous posting of the notice on the website page of the covered entity if the covered entity maintains one; and

Notification to major statewide media.

"Personal information" means a Colorado resident's first name or first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of the following data elements that relate to the resident, when the data elements are not encrypted, redacted, or secured by any other method rendering the name or the element unreadable or unusable: Social security number; student, military, or passport identification number; driver's license number or identification card number; medical information; health insurance identification number; or biometric data;
(g) (I) (A) "Personal information" means a Colorado resident's first name or first initial and last name in combination with any one or more of the following data elements that relate to the resident, when the data elements are not encrypted, redacted, or secured by any other method rendering the name or the element unreadable or unusable: Social security number; student, military, or passport identification number; driver's license number or identification card number; medical information; health insurance identification number; or biometric data;

A Colorado resident's username or e-mail address, in combination with a password or security questions and answers, that would permit access to an online account; or

A Colorado resident's account number or credit or debit card number in combination with any required security code, access code, or password that would permit access to that account.

"Personal information" does not include publicly available information that is lawfully made available to the general public from federal, state, or local government records or widely distributed media.

"Security breach" means the unauthorized acquisition of unencrypted computerized data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of personal information maintained by a covered entity. Good faith acquisition of personal information by an employee or agent of a covered entity for the covered entity's business purposes is not a security breach if the personal information is not used for a purpose unrelated to the lawful operation of the business or is not subject to further unauthorized disclosure.

"Third-party service provider" means an entity that has been contracted to maintain, store, or process personal information on behalf of a covered entity.

Disclosure of breach.

A covered entity that maintains, owns, or licenses computerized data that includes personal information about a resident of Colorado shall, when it becomes aware that a security breach may have occurred, conduct in good faith a prompt investigation to determine the likelihood that personal information has been or will be misused. The covered entity shall give notice to the affected Colorado residents unless the investigation determines that the misuse of information about a Colorado resident has not occurred and is not reasonably likely to occur. Notice must be made in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, but not later than thirty days after the date of determination that a security breach occurred, consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement and consistent with any measures necessary to determine the scope of the breach and to restore the reasonable integrity of the computerized data system.

In the case of a breach of personal information, notice required by this subsection (2) to affected Colorado residents must include, but need not be limited to, the following information:

The date, estimated date, or estimated date range of the security breach;

A description of the personal information that was acquired or reasonably believed to have been acquired as part of the security breach;

Information that the resident can use to contact the covered entity to inquire about the security breach;

The toll-free numbers, addresses, and websites for consumer reporting agencies;

The toll-free number, address, and website for the federal trade commission; and

A statement that the resident can obtain information from the federal trade commission and the credit reporting agencies about fraud alerts and security freezes.

If an investigation by the covered entity pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section determines that the type of personal information described in subsection (1)(g)(I)(B) of this section has been misused or is reasonably likely to be misused, then the covered entity shall, in addition to the notice otherwise required by subsection (2)(a.2) of this section and in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, but not later than thirty days after the date of determination that a security breach occurred, consistent with the legitimate needs of law enforcement and consistent with any measures necessary to determine the scope of the breach and to restore the reasonable integrity of the computerized data system:

(I) Direct the person whose personal information has been breached to promptly change his or her password and security question or answer, as applicable, or to take other steps appropriate to protect the online account with the covered entity and all other online accounts for which the person whose personal information has been breached uses the same username or e-mail address and password or security question or answer.

(II) For log-in credentials of an e-mail account furnished by the covered entity, the covered entity shall not comply with this section by providing the security breach notification to that e-mail address, but may instead comply with this section by providing notice through other methods, as defined in subsection (1)(f) of this section, or by clear and conspicuous notice delivered to the resident online when the resident is connected to the online account from an internet protocol address or online location from which the covered entity knows the resident customarily accesses the account.

The breach of encrypted or otherwise secured personal information must be disclosed in accordance with this section if the confidential process, encryption key, or other means to decipher the secured information was also acquired in the security breach or was reasonably believed to have been acquired.

A covered entity that is required to provide notice to affected Colorado residents pursuant to this subsection (2) is prohibited from charging the cost of providing such notice to such residents.

Nothing in this subsection (2) prohibits the notice described in this subsection (2) from containing additional information, including any information that may be required by state or federal law.

If a covered entity uses a third-party service provider to maintain computerized data that includes personal information, then the third-party service provider shall give notice to and cooperate with the covered entity in the event of a security breach that compromises such computerized data, including notifying the covered entity of any security breach in the most expedient time possible, and without unreasonable delay following discovery of a security breach, if misuse of personal information about a Colorado resident occurred or is likely to occur. Cooperation includes sharing with the covered entity information relevant to the security breach; except that such cooperation does not require the disclosure of confidential business information or trade secrets.

Notice required by this section may be delayed if a law enforcement agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal investigation and the law enforcement agency has notified the covered entity that conducts business in Colorado not to send notice required by this section. Notice required by this section must be made in good faith, in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, but not later than thirty days after the law enforcement agency determines that notification will no longer impede the investigation and has notified the covered entity that conducts business in Colorado that it is appropriate to send the notice required by this section.

If a covered entity is required to notify more than one thousand Colorado residents of a security breach pursuant to this section, the covered entity shall also notify, in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, all consumer reporting agencies that compile and maintain files on consumers on a nationwide basis, as defined by the federal "Fair Credit Reporting Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 1681a (p), of the anticipated date of the notification to the residents and the approximate number of residents who are to be notified. Nothing in this subsection (2)(d) requires the covered entity to provide to the consumer reporting agency the names or other personal information of security breach notice recipients. This subsection (2)(d) does not apply to a covered entity who is subject to Title V of the federal "Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act", 15 U.S.C. sec. 6801 et seq.

A waiver of these notification rights or responsibilities is void as against public policy.

The covered entity that must notify Colorado residents of a data breach pursuant to this section shall provide notice of any security breach to the Colorado attorney general in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay, but not later than thirty days after the date of determination that a security breach occurred, if the security breach is reasonably believed to have affected five hundred Colorado residents or more, unless the investigation determines that the misuse of information about a Colorado resident has not occurred and is not likely to occur.

The Colorado attorney general shall designate a person or persons as a point of contact for functions set forth in this subsection (2)(f) and shall make the contact information for that person or those persons public on the attorney general's website and by any other appropriate means.

The breach of encrypted or otherwise secured personal information must be disclosed in accordance with this section if the confidential process, encryption key, or other means to decipher the secured information was also acquired or was reasonably believed to have been acquired in the security breach.

Procedures deemed in compliance with notice requirements.

Pursuant to this section, a covered entity that maintains its own notification procedures as part of an information security policy for the treatment of personal information and whose procedures are otherwise consistent with the timing requirements of this section is in compliance with the notice requirements of this section if the covered entity notifies affected Colorado residents in accordance with its policies in the event of a security breach; except that notice to the attorney general is still required pursuant to subsection (2)(f) of this section.

A covered entity that is regulated by state or federal law and that maintains procedures for a security breach pursuant to the laws, rules, regulations, guidances, or guidelines established by its state or federal regulator is in compliance with this section; except that notice to the attorney general is still required pursuant to subsection (2)(f) of this section. In the case of a conflict between the time period for notice to individuals that is required pursuant to this subsection (3) and the applicable state or federal law or regulation, the law or regulation with the shortest time frame for notice to the individual controls.

Violations. The attorney general may bring an action in law or equity to address violations of this section, section 6-1-713, or section 6-1-713.5, and for other relief that may be appropriate to ensure compliance with this section or to recover direct economic damages resulting from a violation, or both. The provisions of this section are not exclusive and do not relieve a covered entity subject to this section from compliance with all other applicable provisions of law.

Attorney general criminal authority. Upon receipt of notice pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, and with either a request from the governor to prosecute a particular case or with the approval of the district attorney with jurisdiction to prosecute cases in the judicial district where a case could be brought, the attorney general has the authority to prosecute any criminal violations of section 18-5.5-102.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 536, § 1, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(d) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2064, § 9, effective August 11.

L. 2018:

(1) R&RE, (2), (3), and (4) amended, and (5) added, (HB 18-1128), ch. 266, p. 1634, § 3, effective September 1.

6-1-717. Influencing a real estate appraisal - deceptive trade practice.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of such person's business, vocation, or occupation, the person:

Knowingly submits a false or misleading appraisal in connection with a dwelling offered as security for repayment of a mortgage loan; or

Directly or indirectly compensates, coerces, or intimidates an appraiser, or attempts, directly or indirectly, to compensate, coerce, or intimidate an appraiser, for the purpose of influencing the independent judgment of the appraiser with respect to the value of a dwelling offered as security for repayment of a mortgage loan.

The prohibition referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall not be construed as prohibiting a person from requesting an appraiser to:

Consider additional, appropriate property information;

Provide further detail, substantiation, or explanation for the appraiser's value conclusion; or

Correct errors in the appraisal report.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1727, § 4, effective June 1.

6-1-718. Ticket sales and resales - prohibitions - unlawful conditions - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Operator" means a person or entity who owns, operates, or controls a place of entertainment or who promotes or produces entertainment and that sells a ticket to an event for original sale, including an employee of such person or entity.

"Original sale" means the first sale of a ticket by an operator.

"Place of entertainment" means a public or private entertainment facility, such as a stadium, arena, racetrack, museum, amusement park, or other place where performances, concerts, exhibits, athletic games, or contests are held, for which an entry fee is charged, to which the public is invited to observe, and for which tickets are sold. "Place of entertainment" does not include a ski area.

"Purchaser" means a person or entity who purchases a ticket to a place of entertainment.

"Resale" or "resold" means a sale other than the original sale of a ticket by a person or entity.

"Reseller" means a person or entity that offers or sells tickets for resale after the original sale by the operator including an entity that operates a platform or exchange for the purchase and sale of tickets to events that also engages in the purchase and resale of the ticket either on behalf of the operator or on its own behalf if a reseller.

"Ticket" means a license issued by the operator of a place of entertainment for admission to an event at the date and time specified on the ticket, subject to the terms and conditions as specified by the operator.

Resellers shall guarantee a full refund to a purchaser if:

The event for which the ticket was resold is canceled;

The ticket does not or would not in fact grant the purchaser admission to the event for which the ticket was resold;

The ticket is counterfeit; or

The ticket fails to conform to its description as advertised or as represented to the purchaser by the reseller.

It is void as against public policy to apply a term or condition to the original sale to the purchaser to limit the terms or conditions of resale, including, but not limited to, a term or condition:

That restricts resale in a subscription or season ticket package agreement as a condition of purchase;

That a purchaser must comply with to retain a ticket for the duration of a subscription or season ticket package agreement that limits the rights of the purchaser to resell the ticket;

That a purchaser must comply with to retain any contractually agreed-upon rights to purchase future subscriptions or season ticket package agreements; or

That imposes a sanction on the purchaser if the sale of the ticket is not through a reseller approved by the operator.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to prohibit an operator from prohibiting the resale of a contractual right in a season ticket package agreement that gives the original purchaser a priority or other preference to enter into a subsequent season ticket package agreement with the operator.

A person or entity, including an operator, that regulates admission to an event shall not deny access to the event to a person in possession of a valid ticket to the event, regardless of whether the ticket is subject to a subscription or season ticket package agreement, based solely on the ground that such ticket was resold through a reseller that was not approved by the operator.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit an operator from maintaining and enforcing policies regarding conduct or behavior at or in connection with the operator's venue. An operator may revoke or restrict season tickets for reasons relating to a violation of venue policies and to the extent the operator may deem necessary for the protection of the safety of patrons or to address fraud or misconduct.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 108, § 1, effective March 19.

6-1-719. Truth in music advertising.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Performing group" means a vocal or instrumental group seeking to use the name of a recording group.

"Recording group" means a vocal or instrumental group, at least one of whose members has previously released a commercial sound recording under that group's name and in which at least one of the members has a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group.

"Sound recording" means a work that results from the fixation, on or in a recording medium or other material object, of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds regardless of the nature of the medium or object, such as a disk, tape, or other phono record, in which the sounds are recorded.

Production.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2), it is unlawful for any person to advertise or conduct a live musical performance or production in this state through the use of a false, deceptive, or misleading affiliation, connection, or association between a performing group and a recording group.

Paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) does not apply if:

The performing group is the authorized registrant and owner of a federal service mark for that group registered in the United States patent and trademark office;

At least one member of the performing group was a member of the recording group and has a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group;

The live musical performance or production is identified in all advertising and promotion as a salute or tribute;

The advertising does not relate to a live musical performance or production taking place in this state; or

The performance or production is expressly authorized by the recording group.

Restraining prohibited acts. In addition to the actions and remedies specified in part 1 of this article that may apply:

Injunction. Whenever the attorney general or a district attorney has reason to believe that a person is advertising, conducting, or about to advertise or conduct a live musical performance or production in violation of this section and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the attorney general or district attorney may bring an action in the name of the state against the person to restrain that practice by temporary or permanent injunction.

Payment of costs and restitution. Whenever a court issues a permanent injunction to restrain and prevent violations of this section as authorized in paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), the court may, in its discretion, direct that the defendant restore to any person in interest any moneys or property, real or personal, that may have been acquired by means of a violation of this section, under terms and conditions to be established by the court.

Penalty. A person who violates this section is liable to the state for a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars nor more than fifteen thousand dollars per violation, which civil penalty shall be in addition to any other relief that may be granted under this subsection (3) but which shall not be cumulative with the penalty specified in section 6-1-112. Each performance or production that violates this section constitutes a separate violation.

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 364, § 1, effective August 5.

6-1-720. Online event ticket sales - deceptive trade practice - definitions.

A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when, in the course of the person's business, vocation, or occupation, such person:

Uses or causes to be used a software application that runs automated tasks over the internet to access a computer, computer network, or computer system, or any part thereof, for the purpose of purchasing tickets in excess of authorized limits for an online event ticket sale with the intent to resell such tickets; or

Uses or causes to be used a software application that runs automated tasks over the internet that circumvents or disables any electronic queues, waiting periods, or other sales volume limitation systems associated with an online event ticket sale.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"In excess of authorized limits", with regard to an online purchase of tickets, means exceeding a restriction on the number of individual tickets that can be purchased by any single person or circumventing any other terms and conditions of access to an online event ticket sale established by the event sponsor or promoter.

"Online event ticket sale" means an electronic system utilized by the sponsor or promoter of a sporting or entertainment event to sell tickets to such event to the public over the internet.

This section shall not prohibit the resale of tickets in a secondary market by a person other than the event sponsor or promoter.

Every ticket acquired in violation of this section shall constitute a separate violation for purposes of assessing a civil penalty under section 6-1-112 (1)(a) and (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2008:

Entire section added, p. 2229, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(4) amended, (SB 09-054), ch.138, p. 597, § 3, effective August 5.

6-1-721. Like-kind exchanges by exchange facilitators - deceptive trade practice - definitions.

Legislative declaration. The general assembly hereby:

Finds that, absent enactment of this section, Colorado has no requirements for the protection of taxpayers who engage persons or entities that facilitate like-kind exchanges pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 1031; and

Determines that, to protect taxpayers who engage exchange facilitators, exchange facilitators should meet certain requirements and follow certain procedures.

Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Affiliated with" means that a person directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with the other specified person.

"Colorado property" means real property located in Colorado; except that replacement property need not be located in Colorado.

"Exchange facilitator" means a person that holds a taxpayer's exchange funds and that:

For a fee, facilitates an exchange of like-kind Colorado property by entering into an agreement with a taxpayer by which the exchange facilitator acquires from the taxpayer the contractual rights to sell the taxpayer's relinquished Colorado property and transfer a replacement property to the taxpayer as an exchange facilitator, as is defined in 26 CFR 1.1031(k)-1 (g)(4), or enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to take title to Colorado property as an exchange accommodation titleholder, as that term is defined in federal internal revenue service revenue procedure 2000-37, or enters into an agreement with a taxpayer to act as a qualified trustee or qualified escrow holder, as those terms are defined in 26 CFR 1.1031(k)-1 (g)(3), except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (II) of this paragraph (c); or

Maintains an office in this state for the purpose of soliciting business as an exchange facilitator regarding Colorado property.

"Exchange facilitator" does not include:

The taxpayer or disqualified person, as defined under 26 CFR 1.1031(k)-1 (k), seeking to qualify for the nonrecognition provisions of 26 U.S.C. sec. 1031;

A bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, building and loan association, or credit union; a bank or savings association holding company organized under the laws of any state, the District of Columbia, a territory or protectorate of the United States, or the United States, subject to regulation and supervision by a federal banking agency; an operating subsidiary of such entities; or an employee or exclusive agent of any of such entities, including, without limitation, a subsidiary that is owned or controlled by such entities;

A person who advertises for and teaches seminars or classes for, or gives presentations to, attorneys, accountants, real estate professionals, tax professionals, or other professionals, where the primary purpose is to teach the professionals about tax-deferred exchanges or train them to act as exchange facilitators;

An exchange facilitator, as defined in 26 CFR 1.1031(k)-1 (g)(4), whose sole business in this state as an exchange facilitator consists of holding exchange funds from the disposition of relinquished property located outside this state; or

An entity that is wholly owned by an exchange facilitator or is wholly owned by the owner of an exchange facilitator and is used by that exchange facilitator to facilitate exchanges or to take title to Colorado property as an exchange accommodation titleholder, as defined in federal internal revenue service revenue procedure 2000-37.

For purposes of this paragraph (c), "fee" means compensation of any nature, direct or indirect, monetary or in-kind, that is received by a person or a related person as defined in 26 U.S.C. sec. 1031 (f)(3) for any services relating to or incidental to the exchange of like-kind property under 26 U.S.C. sec. 1031.

"Like-kind exchange" means a section 1031 exchange that is subject to 26 U.S.C. sec. 1031.

"Publicly traded company" means a corporation whose securities are publicly traded on a stock exchange that is regulated by the United States securities and exchange commission. The term "publicly traded company" also includes all subsidiaries of such publicly traded company.

"Section 1031 exchange" means an exchange conducted pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 1031 that allows investors to defer the tax on capital gains.

"Taxpayer exchange funds" or "exchange funds" means money a taxpayer entrusts to an exchange facilitator.

Deceptive trade practices. A person engages in a deceptive trade practice when a person acts as an exchange facilitator and:

Except as specified in subparagraph (III) of this paragraph (a), fails to notify all current clients of any change in control of the exchange facilitator within two business days after the effective date of the change by:

Facsimile, e-mail transmission, or first-class mail; and

Posting such notice on the exchange facilitator's website for a period ending not sooner than ninety days after the change in control.

The notice required in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (a) shall specify the name, address, and other contact information of the transferees.

If the exchange facilitator is a publicly traded company and remains a publicly traded company after a change in control, the exchange facilitator need not notify its client of the change in control.

For purposes of this paragraph (a), "change in control" means any transfer within twelve months of more than fifty percent of the assets or ownership interests, directly or indirectly, of the exchange facilitator.

Fails to maintain adequate financial assurance and errors and omissions insurance or deposits. An exchange facilitator may maintain bonds, insurance policies, deposits, or irrevocable letters of credit in excess of the amounts required by this subparagraph (I). An exchange facilitator shall at all times:

Maintain a fidelity bond or bonds executed by an insurer authorized to do business in this state in the amount of at least one million dollars and maintain a policy of errors and omissions insurance, in an amount of at least two hundred fifty thousand dollars, executed by an insurer authorized to do business in this state;

Deposit an amount of cash or irrevocable letters of credit in an amount of at least the sum of the amounts specified in sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) in an interest-bearing deposit account or in a money market account with a financial institution of the exchange facilitator's choice, with the interest earned on such account accruing to the exchange facilitator; or

Deposit all exchange funds in a qualified escrow or qualified trust as those terms are defined under 26 CFR 1.1031(k)-1 (g)(3) with a financial institution and provide that any withdrawals from such qualified escrow or qualified trust require the taxpayer's and the exchange facilitator's written authorization.

A person claiming to have sustained damage by reason of the failure of an exchange facilitator to comply with this section may file a claim to recover damages from the bond or deposit described in this paragraph (b).

Fails to act as a custodian for all exchange funds, including money, Colorado property, other consideration, or instruments received by the exchange facilitator from or on behalf of the taxpayer, except funds received as the exchange facilitator's compensation. As used in this paragraph (c), "custodian" means a person who has the same responsibilities as a fiduciary under Colorado law to protect and preserve assets and shall not mean a person who has the same responsibilities as a fiduciary under Colorado law to increase assets or to accomplish other fiduciary duties. Exchange funds are not subject to execution or attachment on any claim against an exchange facilitator. An exchange facilitator shall not knowingly keep or cause to be kept any money in a financial institution under any name designating the money as belonging to a taxpayer unless the money equitably belongs to the taxpayer and was actually entrusted to the exchange facilitator by the taxpayer. Taxpayer exchange funds in excess of two hundred fifty thousand dollars shall be invested or deposited in such manner as to require both the taxpayer's and the exchange facilitator's commercially reasonable means of authorization for withdrawal, including: The taxpayer's delivery to the exchange facilitator of the taxpayer's authorization to disburse exchange funds, and the exchange facilitator's delivery to the depository of the exchange facilitator's authorization to disburse exchange funds; or delivery to the depository of both the taxpayer's and the exchange facilitator's authorizations to disburse exchange funds. An exchange facilitator shall provide the taxpayer with written notification of the manner in which the exchange funds will be invested or deposited, shall invest or deposit exchange funds for the benefit of the taxpayer in investments that meet a standard of care that an ordinarily prudent investor would use when dealing with the property of another, and shall satisfy investment goals of liquidity and preservation of principal. For purposes of this paragraph (c), a prudent investor standard of care shall be deemed to have been violated if:

A taxpayer's exchange funds are commingled by the exchange facilitator with the operating accounts of the exchange facilitator or with the exchange funds of another taxpayer; except that an exchange facilitator may aggregate exchange funds. For purposes of this subparagraph (I):

"Aggregate" means to combine exchange funds of multiple taxpayers for investment purposes to achieve common investment goals and efficiencies. Exchange funds that have been aggregated into common investments shall be readily identifiable by the financial institution or other regulated investment custodian holding the funds as to each taxpayer for whom they are held through an accounting or subaccounting system.

"Commingle" means to mix together exchange funds of taxpayers with other funds belonging to or under the control of the exchange facilitator in such a manner that a taxpayer's exchange funds cannot be distinguished from other funds belonging to or under the control of the exchange facilitator.

Exchange funds are loaned or otherwise transferred to any person or entity affiliated with the exchange facilitator; except that this subparagraph (II) shall not apply to a transfer or loan made to a financial institution that is the parent of or affiliated with the exchange facilitator or from an exchange facilitator to an exchange accommodation titleholder, as defined in federal internal revenue service revenue procedure 2000-37, as required under the section 1031 exchange contract; or

Exchange funds are invested in a manner that does not provide sufficient liquidity to meet the exchange facilitator's contractual obligations to the taxpayer and does not preserve the principal of the exchange funds. The deposit of funds in a financial institution exempted from this section pursuant to sub-subparagraph (B) of subparagraph (II) of paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of this section shall be deemed to be sufficiently liquid to meet the requirements of this subparagraph (III).

Commits any of the following:

Knowingly makes any material misrepresentation concerning an exchange facilitator's transaction that is intended to mislead another;

Pursues a continued or flagrant course of misrepresentation or makes false statements through advertising or otherwise;

Fails, within a reasonable time, to account for any money or property belonging to others that may be in the possession or under the control of the exchange facilitator;

Engages in any conduct constituting fraudulent or dishonest dealing;

Is convicted of, or, in the case of an entity, one or more of its owners, officers, directors, or employees who has access to exchange funds is convicted of, any crime involving fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, embezzlement, misappropriation of funds, robbery, or other theft of property; except that commission of such crime by an officer, director, or employee of an exchange facilitator shall not be considered a violation of this subparagraph (V) if the employment or appointment of the officer, director, or employee has been terminated and no clients of the exchange facilitator were harmed or full restitution has been made to all harmed clients;

Wilfully fails to fulfill an exchange facilitator's contractual duties to the taxpayer to deliver property or funds to the taxpayer unless such failure is due to circumstances beyond the control of the exchange facilitator;

Materially violates this section or aids, abets, or knowingly permits any person to violate this section;

Commits an act that does not meet generally accepted standards of practice for ordinarily prudent investors or fails to perform an act necessary to meet generally accepted standards of practice for ordinarily prudent investors;

Fails to keep appropriate business and transaction records, falsifies such records, or knowingly and wilfully makes incorrect entries of an essential nature on such records; except that an exchange facilitator may dispose of records after a reasonable time pursuant to the exchange facilitator's document retention and document destruction policy;

Is disciplined in any way by a national certifying agency or by a regulatory agency of another jurisdiction for conduct that relates to the person's employment as an exchange facilitator; or

Is convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to a felony or any crime defined in title 18, C.R.S., that relates to the person's employment as an exchange facilitator. A certified copy of the judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction of the conviction or plea shall be prima facie evidence of the conviction or plea.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1254), ch. 116, p. 487, § 1, effective April 16.